Maine, session 132, LD2019.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §13742-A, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2021, c. 303, §3, is
further amended to read:
F. A violation of section 13800‑B; or
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §13742-A, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 303, §4, is
amended to read:
G. A violation of section 13725.; or
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §13742-A, sub-§1, ¶H is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2818(02)

H. Failing to file with the board an applicable registration number described in section
13758, subsection 4, paragraph B once that applicable registration number is obtained.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §13758, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. DD, §28,
is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
4. Form. License forms must state:
A. The applicant's name, address, day phone, 24-hour phone, ownership status and
manufacturer or wholesaler designation;
B. The applicant's United States Department of Justice, Drug Enforcement
Administration registration number and the applicant's United States Food and Drug
Administration registration number, as applicable, if the applicant has obtained the
registration number at the time the form is executed; and
C. The date the form is executed.
License forms must be executed by an owner or officer of the manufacturer or wholesaler,
providing printed name and title.
If, at the time the form is executed, the applicant has not obtained a registration number
described in paragraph B that is applicable to the applicant, the applicant shall file that
registration number with the board once the registration number is obtained.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2818(02)